Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-214
Control of advertising outside of right-of-way; adoption of rules and regulations by Department of Transportation; minimum requirements.

Whenever advertising rights are acquired by the Department of Transportation pursuant to subdivision (2)(m) of section 39-1320 or an agreement has been entered into as authorized by section 39-213, it shall be the duty of the department to adopt and promulgate reasonable rules and regulations for the control of outdoor advertising within the area specified in such subdivision, which rules and regulations shall have as their minimum requirements the provisions of 23 U.S.C. 131 and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, as amended on March 27, 1972.

Laws 1961, c. 195, § 4, p. 597;

Laws 1972, LB 1181, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 39-1320.03;

Laws 1995, LB 264, § 8;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 96.

An injunction may properly be entered to require compliance with the statute making it unlawful to erect or maintain advertising signs along highways prior to determination of whether there is a right to damages resulting from application of the statute. State v. Mayhew Products Corp., 204 Neb. 266, 281 N.W.2d 783 (1979).

Sections 39-1320 to 39-1320.11 constitute a reasonable and valid exercise of the police power which bears a substantial relation to the public health, safety, and general welfare and are constitutional. State v. Mayhew Products Corp., 204 Neb. 266, 281 N.W.2d 783 (1979).

Description of easement sought to be acquired was sufficient. State v. Day, 181 Neb. 308, 147 N.W.2d 919 (1967).